Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-258
Deeds and other instruments; formal defects; recorded for more than ten years; validated.

When any instrument of writing, in any manner affecting or purporting to affect the title to real estate, has been, or may hereafter be recorded for a period of ten years in the office of the register of deeds of the county wherein such real estate is situated, and such instrument, or the record thereof, because of defect, irregularity or omission, fails to comply in any respect with any statutory requirement or requirements relating to the execution, attestation, acknowledgment, certificate of acknowledgment, recording or certificate of recording, such instrument and the record thereof shall, notwithstanding any or all of such defects, irregularities and omissions, be fully legal, valid, binding and effectual for all purposes to the same extent as though such instrument had, in the first instance, been in all respects duly executed, attested, acknowledged and recorded.

Laws 1941, c. 152, § 1, p. 593;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-276;

R.S.1943, § 76-258.

Defects in execution of deed are cured after passage of ten-year period. Bailey v. Karnopp, 170 Neb. 836, 104 N.W.2d 417 (1960).